test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-blaavvat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - blávvat: # A_BLAAVVAT

    blávvat+A+Attr: blävvis

    blávvat+A+Sg+Nom: blávvat
    blávvat+A+Pl+Nom: blávvada


    blávvat+A+Comp+Attr: blávvadup

    blávvat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: blávvadup
    blávvat+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [blávvadubo, blávvaduba]
#    blávvat+A+Comp+Pl+Nom+Use/NG: blávvaduba


    blávvat+A+Superl+Attr: blávvadumos

    blávvat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: blávvadumos
    blávvat+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: blávvadubmusa
